Maryland, session 2025, HB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1405.
(b) An authority may:
(18) raise revenue by any legal means required to make the operations and
activities of the authority self–sustaining; [and]
(19) CREATE A SPECIAL FUND FOR THE PURPOSE OF PLEDGING THE
ASSETS OF THE AUTHORITY IN ORDER TO LEVERAGE PRIVATE INVESTMENT TO
ACCOMPLISH THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(20) MAKE LOANS OR GRANTS, IN THE FORM REQUIRED BY THE
AUTHORITY, TO ASSIST WITH THE FINANCING OF PROJECTS TO ACCOMPLISH THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(21) ENTER INTO PARTNERSHIPS WITH OTHER ENTITIES TO
FACILITATE THE FINANCING OF PROJECTS TO ACCOMPLISH THE PURPOSES OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
[(19)] (22) do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted by this subtitle or by an ordinance adopted under this subtitle.
1–1406.
(a) An authority may:
(4) procure insurance against loss in connection with the property, assets,
or activities of the authority; [and]

HOUSE BILL 1128 3
(5) execute deeds, mortgages, contracts, leases, purchases, or other
agreements regarding the property of the authority; AND
(6) IF AUTHORIZED UNDER §§ 14–873 THROUGH 14–876 OF THE TAX
– PROPERTY ARTICLE, FORECLOSE ON A PROPERTY THROUGH AN IN REM
FORECLOSURE ACTION.
(D) (1) IF AN AUTHORITY SELLS, LEASES, TRANSFERS, OR DISPOSES OF
AN INTEREST IN THE AUTHORITY’S PROPERTY, THE SALE, LEASE, TRANSFER, OR
DISPOSITION SHALL INCLUDE AN AGREEMENT THAT STATES THE TERMS
REGARDING:
(I) PROPERTY MAINTENANCE;
(II) PROPERTY OUTCOMES AND USES; AND
(III) ANY OTHER CONDITIONS OR PROVISIONS THE AUTHORITY
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
(2) THE AUTHORITY MAY REENTER A PROPERTY AND TAKE ANY
ACTION NECESSARY TO TAKE POSSESSION OF A PROPERTY AND TERMINATE THE
INTEREST CONVEYED TO A PURCHASER IF THE PURCHASER:
(I) BREACHES ANY AGREEMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND HAS NOT COMPLETED ANY AGREED–ON IMPROVEMENTS TO
THE PROPERTY;
(II) FAILS TO OBTAIN PERMITS THAT THE PURCHASER AGREED
TO OBTAIN;
(III) FAILS TO DILIGENTLY PURSUE CONSTRUCTION OR
REHABILITATION OF THE PROPERTY; OR
(IV) FAILS TO COMPLETE ANY CONSTRUCTION ON OR
REHABILITATION OF THE PROPERTY BY THE TIME THAT THE PURCHASER AGREED.
Article – Tax – Property
14–874.
(a) Real property may be subject to foreclosure and sale under this part only if:

HOUSE BILL 1128
(1) the property consists of a vacant lot or improved property cited as
vacant and unsafe or unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building
violation notice; and
(2) the total amount of liens for unpaid taxes on the property exceeds the
lesser of the total value of the property as last determined by the Department or as
determined by an appraisal report prepared not more than 6 months before the filing of a
complaint under this section by a real estate appraiser who is licensed under Title 16 of the
Business Occupations and Professions Article.
(b) (1) A county or municipal corporation may authorize by law an in rem
foreclosure in accordance with this part.
(2) A LAW THAT AUTHORIZES AN IN REM FORECLOSURE MAY
AUTHORIZE A LAND BANK AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 14
OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE TO EXERCISE THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF
THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY UNDER THIS PART.
(3) A law that authorizes an in rem foreclosure shall:
(i) state the date after which real property may be subject to in rem
foreclosure under this part;
(ii) establish criteria for designating real property to be foreclosed
under this part;
(iii) authorize the county [or], THE municipal corporation, OR A
LAND BANK AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 14 OF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE to file a complaint for an in rem foreclosure under this part; and
(iv) include administrative rules and procedures necessary to carry
out an in rem foreclosure under this part.
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a county or municipal
corporation may authorize, by law, the sale of real property after an in rem foreclosure and
designate real property to be sold under this part.
(2) A law that authorizes a sale of real property after an in rem foreclosure
shall:
(i) state the date after which the real property may be subject to sale
after an in rem foreclosure under this part;
(ii) establish criteria for designating real property to be sold under
this part; and

HOUSE BILL 1128 5
(iii) include administrative rules and procedures necessary to carry
out a sale under this part.
(d) Only real property that consists of a vacant lot or improved property cited as
vacant and unsafe or unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building
violation notice may be sold under this part.
14–875.
(a) A county [or], municipal corporation, OR LAND BANK AUTHORITY
AUTHORIZED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION may file a complaint for an
in rem foreclosure action in accordance with this part.
(b) The county [or], municipal corporation, OR LAND BANK AUTHORITY
AUTHORIZED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION may not file a complaint for
an in rem foreclosure action unless:
(1) the tax on the real property has been delinquent for at least 6 months;
and
(2) the right to appeal the notice of the property as vacant and unsafe or
unfit has tolled.
(c) All taxes shall:
(1) be included in the foreclosure action; and
(2) cease to be a lien against the real property if a judgment is entered
foreclosing the existing interests of all interested parties in the real property.
(d) The county [or], municipal corporation, OR LAND BANK AUTHORITY
AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION shall:
(1) file the complaint for an in rem foreclosure in the circuit court of the
county where the real property is located; and
(2) within 5 days after filing the complaint, send notice and a copy of the
complaint to each interested party by first–class mail and certified mail, postage prepaid,
return receipt requested, bearing a postmark from the United States Postal Service.
14–876.
(c) If the circuit court finds that the county [or], municipal corporation, OR LAND
BANK AUTHORITY AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION sent
notice and a copy of the complaint to each interested party in accordance with § 14–875(d)

HOUSE BILL 1128
of this subtitle and that the information set forth in the complaint is accurate, the court
shall:
(1) enter a judgment that:
(i) proper notice has been provided to all interested parties; and
(ii) the real property is a vacant lot or an improved property cited as
vacant and unsafe or unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building
violation notice; and
(2) order that ownership of the real property be transferred to the county
[or], municipal corporation, OR LAND BANK AUTHORITY on behalf of which the complaint
was filed.
(d) (1) The county [or], municipal corporation, OR LAND BANK AUTHORITY
AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION shall record a judgment
under subsection (c) of this section in the land records of the county.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.